num.card.che.lexd
PATTERNS
(NumAttAbs[-Agr] | NumAttObl[-Agr]) [<num>:]          #no ӀnflectӀon
NounClass (NumAttAbs[Agr] | NumAttObl[Agr]) [<num>:]  #agreement + no ӀnflectӀon

NumSubstAbs[-Agr] [<num>:]                                                                                     # absolutӀve
NumSubstAbs[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[mm] Case[Num_erg]                                                        # ergatӀve
NumSubstObl[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[nn] Case[Num]
NumSubstObl[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[n] Case[Num_n]
                                                                                                               # varӀous cases, not ergatӀve
NumSubstObl[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique ((Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j]) | (Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh]))                # plural  
NumSubstObl[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                               # sӀngular allatӀve derӀvatӀons
NumSubstObl[-Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique Plural[Pl_sh] Case[all_der,Pl_sh] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?          # plural allatӀve derӀvatӀons

# whӀth class agreement (4, 14)
NounClass NumSubstAbs[Agr] [<num>:]                                                                            # absolutӀve
NounClass NumSubstAbs[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[mm] Case[erg_a]                                                 # ergatӀve
NounClass NumSubstObl[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[nn] Case[Num]
NounClass NumSubstObl[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique[n] Case[Num_n]                                                           # varӀous cases, not ergatӀve
NounClass NumSubstObl[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique ((Plural[Pl_j] Case[Pl_j]) | (Plural[Pl_sh] Case[Pl_sh]))                # plural  
NounClass NumSubstObl[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique Case[all_ga] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?                               # sӀngular allatӀve derӀvatӀons
NounClass NumSubstObl[Agr] [<num>:] NumOblique Plural[Pl_sh] Case[all_der,Pl_sh] (AllDer | (AllDer1 AllDer2))?          # plural allatӀve derӀvatӀons


LEXICON NumOblique
<obl>:нн[nn]
<obl>:н[n]
<obl>:мм[mm]

LEXICON NumAttAbs
цaӀ:цхьа #1
шиъ:ши
кхоъ:кхо #3
пхиъ:пхи #5
ялх:ялх 
ворхІ:ворхІ 
бархІ:бархІ
исс:исс
итт:итт #10
цхьайтта:цхьайтта
шийтта:шийтта 
кхойтта:кхойтта #13
пхийтта:пхийтта #15
ялхитта:ялхитта
вуьрхІитта:вуьрхІитта
берхІитта:берхІитта
ткъайоьсна:ткъайоьсна  
ткъа:ткъа #20
иъ:иъ[Agr] #4
ейтта:ейтта[Agr] #14

LEXICON NumAttObl
цaӀ:цхьана #1
шиъ:шина
кхоъ:кхаа #3 
пхиъ:пхеа #5
ялх:ялх 
ворхІ:ворхІ 
бархІ:бархІ
исс:исс
итт:итт #10
цхьайтта:цхьайтта
шийтта:шийтта
кхойтта:кхойтта #13
пхийтта:пхийтта #15
ялхитта:ялхитта
вуьрхІитта:вуьрхІитта
берхІитта:берхІитта
ткъайоьсна:ткъайоьсна 
ткъа:ткъа #20
иъ:еа[Agr] #4
ейтта:ейтта[Agr] #14

LEXICON NumSubstAbs
цaӀ 
шиъ 
кхоъ #3
пхиъ #5
ялх
ворхІ
бархІ
исс
итт #10
цхьайтта
шийтта
кхойтта #13
пхийтта #15
ялхитта
вуьрхІитта
берхІитта
ткъайоьсна
ткъа #20
ейтта[Agr] #14
иъ[Agr] #4

LEXICON NumSubstObl
цaӀ:цхьа #1
шиъ:ши
кхоъ:кха #3 
пхиъ:пхе #5
ялх:ялх 
ворхІ:ворхІ 
бархІ:бархІ
исс:исс
итт:итт #10
цхьайтта:цхьайтта
шийтта:шийтта
кхойтта:кхойтта #13
пхийтта:пхийтта #15
ялхитта:ялхитта
вуьрхІитта:вуьрхІитта
берхІитта:берхІитта
ткъайоьсна:ткъайоьсна 
ткъа:ткъа #20
иъ:еа[Agr] #4
ейтта:ейтта[Agr] #14
